Utah statutes.
39-1-63.   Tuition assistance for National Guard members -- Use and allocation -- Appropriation.

(1) The Utah National Guard may provide tuition assistance to members for study at postsecondary institutions of learning, including Applied Technology Centers, subject to the following requirements:

(a)  The individual must be, at the time he or she receives the assistance, an active member of the Utah National Guard.

(b)  The assistance is for tuition only and shall be not more than the resident tuition for the actual course of postsecondary study engaged in by the individual.

(2)  Tuition assistance shall be awarded for each academic year.  Students may apply to the adjutant general for assistance for each year during which he or she is an active member of the Utah National Guard.  In awarding assistance, the adjutant general shall consider the recruitment and retention needs of the National Guard.

(3) Tuition assistance is to be paid by the adjutant general of the state directly to the institutions involved from the funds appropriated.

(4)  The adjutant general of the state shall establish regulations, procedures, forms, and reports necessary to administer the allocation of assistance and payment of funds under this section.

(5)  The adjutant general shall include a request each year for funds for this program in the annual budget for the National Guard.

(6)  A person who transfers from the Select Reserve to the National Guard is not eligible for the tuition assistance in this section for one year from the date of transfer.



Amended by Chapter 233, 1998 General Session

